District of Columbia statutes.
42-3173.09

Judicial review of final determination.

(a)

Within 30 days after the date of the mailing of the notice of final determination under § 42-3173.07, an interested party may file a petition for review in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia challenging the final determination.

(b)

If a petition has been filed under subsection (a) of this section and the Mayor has been served with the petition, the Mayor shall not demolish or enclose the deteriorated structure under the authority of this subchapter until the court issues an order authorizing the Mayor to act, enters final judgment against the petitioner, or dismisses the petition.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 449
as added Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 102, 49 DCR 1468

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-3173.02 and § 42-3173.08.